Louisiana, session 2026, HB567.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:621.23 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§621.23. Twenty-Third Judicial District
A. The Twenty-Third Judicial District Court shall have six judges. One
judge shall be elected from election section one, and five judges shall be elected
from election section two.
B.(1) Beginning August 1, 2026, the subject matter jurisdiction of Division
F of the Twenty-Third Judicial District Court is limited, in accordance with Article
V, Section 15(A) of the Constitution of Louisiana, to family matters as provided by
law. The limited subject matter jurisdiction of Division F shall also include all
incidental actions involving family matters, including but not limited to contempt,
civil warrants, writs of habeas corpus, curatorship, change of name, prenuptial or
separate property agreements, interspousal donations, lesions, and challenges to
consent judgments.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1268 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 567
(2) For the purposes of this Subsection, "family matters" includes all actions
arising under Titles V and VII of Book I and Title VI of Book III of the Civil Code;
adoptions arising under the Civil Code and the Children's Code; actions involving
domestic abuse pursuant to R.S. 46:2132 et seq.; and actions for the enforcement or
collection of support and paternity pursuant to R.S. 46:236.5.
(3) The subject matter jurisdiction of the remaining divisions of the Twenty-
Third Judicial District Court shall not be divested or reduced by the subject matter
limitation of Division F. The remaining divisions of the court may continue
exercising jurisdiction over family matters. If the judge of Division F is recused or
is unable to act on a family matter for any reason, that matter shall be randomly
allotted to a different division of the Twenty-Third Judicial District Court.